Utah statutes.
75-3-503.   Effect on other proceedings.
(1)  The pendency of a proceeding for supervised administration of a
decedent's estate stays action on any informal application then pending or
thereafter filed.
(2)  If a will has been previously probated in informal proceedings, the
effect of the filing of a petition for supervised administration is as
provided for formal testacy proceedings by Section 75-3-401.
(3)  After he has received notice of the filing of a petition for supervised
administration, a personal representative who has been appointed previously
shall not exercise his power to distribute any estate.  The filing of the
petition does not affect his other powers and duties unless the court
restricts the exercise of any of them pending full hearing on the petition.
